District of Columbia statutes.
22-1006

Prosecution of offenders; disposition of fines.

It shall be the duty of all marshals, deputy marshals, police officers, or any humane officer of the Washington Humane Society, to prosecute all violations of the provisions of §§ 22-1001 to 22-1009 and §§ 22-1011, 22-1013, and 22-1014, which shall come to their notice or knowledge, and fines and forfeitures collected upon or resulting from the complaint or information of any humane officer of the Washington Humane Society under §§ 22-1001 to 22-1009 and §§ 22-1011, 22-1013, and 22-1014 [repealed] shall inure and be paid over to said association, in aid of the benevolent objects for which it was incorporated.

Aug. 23, 1871, Leg. Assem., p. 137, ch. 106, § 6
Feb. 13, 1885, 23 Stat. 302, ch. 58, § 1
Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1195, ch. 854, § 41
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-303, § 2(d), 47 DCR 7307
1981 Ed., § 22-806.
1973 Ed., § 22-806.
D.C. Law 13-303 substituted “humane office” for “member” in two places.